District of Columbia statutes.
22-3807

When hearing is required.

If, in their reports filed pursuant to § 22-3806, both psychiatrists state that the patient is a sexual psychopath, or if both state that they are unable to reach any conclusion by reason of the partial or complete refusal of the patient to submit to thorough examination, or if one states that the patient is a sexual psychopath and the other states that he or she is unable to reach any conclusion by reason of the partial or complete refusal of the patient to submit to thorough examination, then the court shall conduct a hearing in the manner provided in § 22-3808 to determine whether the patient is a sexual psychopath. If, on the basis of the reports filed, the court is not required to conduct such a hearing, the court shall enter an order dismissing the proceeding under this chapter determine whether the patient is a sexual psychopath.

History

June 9, 1948, 62 Stat. 349, ch. 428, title II, § 205
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 20(e), 41 DCR 1639

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3810.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3507.
1973 Ed., § 22-3507.